Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1735.03
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Health and Human Services carry out the requirements of sections 68-1735 and 68-1735.01 within the limits of its annual appropriation.

Laws 2012, LB507, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 17.